District of Columbia statutes.
7-2034

License required.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in this subchapter, no person shall, either directly or indirectly, operate a child development facility in the District without first having obtained a license to do so.

(b)

An applicant for a license to operate a child development facility shall establish to the satisfaction of the Mayor, that the facility meets all requirements set forth in this subchapter and rules adopted pursuant to this subchapter.

(c)

An applicant for a license shall:

(1)

Submit an application to the Mayor on a form required and provided by the Mayor;

(2)

Submit supporting documentation required by the Mayor; and

(3)

Pay the applicable fee established by the Mayor, except that no license fee shall be required of any child development facility operated by the District government.

(d)

The license shall be valid for a period of time to be determined by the Mayor and only for the premises and persons named as applicants in the application. Any change in ownership of a licensee owned by a person or in the legal or beneficial ownership of a percentage of stock established by rule of a corporate licensee shall require relicensure.

(e)

The Mayor may authorize the issuance of provisional and restricted licenses under specific circumstances and criteria to be established by rule.

Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-215, § 5, 46 DCR 274
1981 Ed., § 6-3624.
See notes to § 7-2031.
For temporary addition of subchapter, see notes to § 7-2031.